Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-179.01
Certified bill of sale, defined.

Certified bill of sale means a document generated by the Nebraska Brand Committee from information provided electronically by a qualified dairy when selling calves under thirty days of age for beef production purposes. Such information shall include the name and physical address of the seller, the name and physical address of the purchaser, the number of head being sold, a physical description of the calves including date of birth, the color and sex, any identifiers such as metal tags or dangle tags, and any brands and their location, the date of the transfer of ownership, and if the assessment imposed pursuant to the federal Beef Promotion and Research Order, 7 C.F.R. part 1260, has been collected.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 4.